Alabama, session 2026rs, HB643.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) If any child is born in this state to a
surrogate, the probate court in the county where the child is
born shall do all of the following:
(1) Review any pre-birth custodial order or other
surrogacy agreement establishing the intended parent or
parents, solely for the purpose of identifying the intended
parent or parents.
(2) Confirm the identity of the intended parent or
parents.
(3) Ensure that the child is given directly to the
custody of an intended parent.
(b) Before a child born to a surrogate may be
Page 2

(b) Before a child born to a surrogate may be
HB643 INTRODUCED
relinquished to an intended parent, the intended parent shall
provide the hospital, birthing center, or other facility where
the child is born with a certified copy of the order
confirming the identify of the intended parent or parents. No
child born to a surrogate may be relinquished to any
individual who is not confirmed as an intended parent, as
identified pursuant to subsection (a).
(c)(1) If an intended parent does not appear in this
state to physically receive the child, the State Department of
Human Resources shall temporarily take custody of the child,
until such time that an intended parent: (i) provides the
department with a certified copy of the order confirming the
identify of the intended parent or parents; and (ii)
physically retrieves the child from the custody of the
department.
(2) The State Department of Human Resources may adopt
rules to implement this subsection.
(d) Each hospital, birthing center, and any other
facility that offers labor and delivery services in this state
shall adopt a policy to ensure children born to surrogates are
relinquished in compliance with this section.
(e) This section may not be construed to limit the
ability of any individuals in this state to enter into a
surrogacy arrangement.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3